Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.070

Appeals to formation.

(1) Any person who objects to formation of the district may appeal the final decision of a legislative authority to approve a petition for formation of a community facilities district by filing an appeal with the superior court of the county in which any part of the district is located within thirty days of the effective date of the resolution approving formation of the district.

(2) If no appeal is timely filed, then the legislative authority's decision is deemed valid, complete, and final, and neither the legal existence of the district, nor the terms and conditions of an approved petition can thereafter be challenged or questioned by any person on the grounds of procedural defect or otherwise. Certified copies of each resolution approving a district must be filed with the auditor of the county or counties in which the community facilities district is located.

[ 2010 c 7 s 206.]